Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5311YH (4) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2153 Section 1. Section 256.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 80. Publish on the departmentâs internet 3 site the policies related to artificial intelligence received 4 from all of the following: 5 a. Community colleges pursuant to section 260C.14, 6 subsection 27. 7 b. School districts pursuant to section 279.89. 8 Sec. 2. Section 260C.14, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 9 following new subsection: 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 27. a. (1) On or before July 1, 2028, 11 adopt a policy related to artificial intelligence that 12 describes all of the following: 13 (a) When a student attending the community college may 14 utilize artificial intelligence during classroom instructional 15 time and during the completion of course or program work. 16 (b) When a faculty or staff member of the community college 17 may utilize artificial intelligence during the completion of 18 work-related duties. 19 (c) Prohibitions related to the use of artificial 20 intelligence by students attending the community college, 21 faculty members of the community college, and staff members of 22 the community college. 23 (2) Publish the policy on the community collegeâs internet 24 site. 25 (3) Provide a copy of the policy to the director of the 26 department of education. 27 b. For purposes of this subsection, âartificial 28 intelligenceâ means any machine-based system that, for any 29 explicit or implicit objective, infers from the inputs the 30 system receives to generate outputs, including content, 31 decisions, predictions, or recommendations, that can influence 32 physical or virtual environments. 33 Sec. 3. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 34 following new subsection: 35 -1- LSB 5311YH (4) 91 jda/jh 1/ 4 H.F. 2153 NEW SUBSECTION . 43. a. (1) Direct the institutions of 1 higher education under its control to, on or before July 1, 2 2028, adopt a policy related to artificial intelligence that 3 describes all of the following: 4 (a) When a student may utilize artificial intelligence 5 during classroom instructional time and during the completion 6 of course or program work. 7 (b) When a faculty or staff member may utilize artificial 8 intelligence during the completion of work-related duties. 9 (c) Prohibitions related to the use of artificial 10 intelligence by students, faculty members, and staff members. 11 (2) Publish the policy on the institution of higher 12 educationâs internet site. 13 (3) Provide a copy of the policy to the board. 14 b. Publish the policies received pursuant to paragraph âaâ , 15 subparagraph (3), on the boardâs internet site. 16 c. For purposes of this subsection, âartificial 17 intelligenceâ means any machine-based system that, for any 18 explicit or implicit objective, infers from the inputs the 19 system receives to generate outputs, including content, 20 decisions, predictions, or recommendations, that can influence 21 physical or virtual environments. 22 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 279.89 Artificial intelligence 23 policies. 24 1. The board of directors of each school district shall do 25 all of the following: 26 a. On or before July 1, 2028, adopt a policy related to 27 artificial intelligence that describes all of the following: 28 (1) When a student enrolled in the school district may 29 utilize artificial intelligence during classroom instructional 30 time and during the completion of school work. 31 (2) When an employee of the school district may utilize 32 artificial intelligence during the completion of work-related 33 duties. 34 (3) Prohibitions related to the use of artificial 35 -2- LSB 5311YH (4) 91 jda/jh 2/ 4 H.F. 2153 intelligence by students enrolled in the school district and by 1 employees of the school district. 2 b. Publish the policy on the school districtâs internet 3 site. 4 c. Provide a copy of the policy to the director of the 5 department of education. 6 2. For purposes of this section, âartificial intelligenceâ 7 means any machine-based system that, for any explicit or 8 implicit objective, infers from the inputs the system receives 9 to generate outputs, including content, decisions, predictions, 10 or recommendations, that can influence physical or virtual 11 environments. 12